Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 30 Protection and Supervision of Criminal Witnesses

12-30-1.
Statement of purpose.

The effective prosecution of persons involved in organized criminal activity often requires the development and use of testimony obtained from witnesses who were themselves involved in crime. These witnesses include victims of crime, material witnesses or any person prepared to provide relevant testimony or information to law enforcement officers engaged in an ongoing criminal investigation, or to any court. These witnesses are to be protected from actions wrongfully taken against them, or their family, because of their participation as a witness. The standards set forth in this chapter are intended:

To encourage the cooperation of potential witnesses with law enforcement authorities;

To assure the safety and security of those witnesses;

To provide accountability in the cost and operation of the witness program; and

To protect the community from those with a history of criminal behavior.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 65, § 1; P.L. 2001, ch. 244, § 1.

12-30-2.
Agreement with witness.

Whenever any law enforcement official of the state or any city or town determines that a person who is: (1) incarcerated upon conviction for a felony; (2) indicted or informed against for a felony; or (3) the subject of a felony investigation; is willing to give evidence regarding the commission of felony offenses within the state in exchange for a reduction of his or her sentence, assistance in obtaining parole, the dismissal or reduction of charges pending against him or her, and/or immunity from prosecution, the official shall immediately notify the attorney general. An assistant attorney general and the law enforcement official shall interview the prospective witness to determine what information he or she possesses and what consideration he or she is seeking for his or her testimony. If they determine that the evidence proffered is reliable and that the consideration sought is reasonable, the assistant attorney general shall prepare a written memorandum setting forth all of the terms of the agreement which shall be signed by the witness, a representative of the law enforcement agency initiating the case, and representative of the attorney general’s office. The terms of the agreement shall include the length and manner of custodial supervision to be provided in order to accomplish both the protection and incarceration of the criminal witness. The document shall explicitly state that the agreement will become void if the criminal witness violates the terms of his or her confinement, fails to provide the promised information and assistance to the prosecution, or commits a new crime. The prospective witness shall be afforded the right to counsel during the negotiation and execution of the agreement. The memorandum shall not become binding and enforceable by the parties until approved in accordance with the procedures set forth in §

12-30-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-3.
Witness protection review board.

There is created within the attorney general’s office a witness protection review board, consisting of an assistant attorney general appointed by the attorney general, an officer of the state police appointed by the superintendent of state police, and a municipal police chief appointed by the president of the Rhode Island Police Chiefs’ Association.

No agreement which obligates any law enforcement agency of the state or its municipalities to provide protection for and/or to release from custody, or dismiss pending charges against any criminal witness (i.e., a person who is incarcerated upon conviction for a felony, who is indicted or informed against for a felony, or who is the subject of a felony investigation) in exchange for his or her testimony, shall take effect until it has been approved by a majority vote of the review board. The board shall review each agreement to determine whether:

The evidence proffered justifies the reduction of sentence and/or dismissal of charges;

Adequate provision has been made to insure the safety of the witness and his or her immediate family, if any, during the times in which he or she will be cooperating with law enforcement authorities and during his or her resettlement thereafter;

The witness will serve any sentence of confinement imposed upon him or her for his or her crimes in a sufficiently restrictive environment;

The cost of maintaining the witness in the protection program is reasonable; and

The witness will pose any threat of future criminality if released into the community pursuant to the terms of the agreement.

In determining whether to approve the agreement, the board shall consider whether the particular witness could be better managed if responsibility for his or her custody were transferred to the witness protection program, operated by the United States Justice Department.

The recommendation of the review board shall be presented to the attorney general, whose approval shall be required prior to implementation of the agreement. Once approved by the review board and the attorney general, any provision of the agreement reducing the sentence of, transferring the custody of, dismissing the charges against, and/or agreeing to immunize the witness must be presented to the superior court for its approval in accordance with applicable statutes and the rules of that court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-4.
Noncriminal witnesses.

Whenever any law enforcement official of the state or any city or town determines that a prospective witness who is not incarcerated, charged, or under investigation for commission of a felony requires custodial protection and/or assistance with relocation due to a threat to the safety of that witness or his or her family, the official shall immediately notify the attorney general. An assistant attorney general and the law enforcement official shall interview the prospective witness to determine what information he or she possesses and what level of protection is required. If they determine that the evidence proffered is reliable and that the protection is necessary, the assistant attorney general shall prepare a written memorandum setting forth a summation of the information to be provided and the nature and cost of the protection to be afforded. This memorandum shall be presented to the witness protection review board for its review and approval pursuant to §

12-30-3

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-5.
Supervision.

Whenever the terms of an agreement with a criminal witness provide for him or her to serve a period of incarceration in the state, his or her confinement shall be either at the adult correctional institutions (ACI) or at a facility maintained and supervised by the state police. The court by order shall set forth whether custody of the criminal witness shall be maintained by the department of corrections or the state police. If the place of confinement is other than at the ACI, the witness shall be under guard by law enforcement officials at all times. He or she shall not be permitted to leave the place of confinement unless escorted by a law enforcement guard. The officers selected to guard the witness shall have no other involvement in the case or cases in which the witness is providing evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 327, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-6.
Record of supervision.

The agency responsible for supervision of the protected criminal witness shall maintain a daily record of the witness’ activities. That record shall include, but not be limited to:

The identity of all persons assigned to guard the witness and the hours of their duty;

The identity of all persons visiting the witness and the purpose and duration of those visits;

The identity of all persons making telephone calls to or being called by the witness and the purposes and duration of those calls;

The destination and purpose of any movement of the witness from his or her place of confinement, the identity of any persons traveling with the witness, and the duration of the trip; and

An itemization of all expenditures of public funds made by or on behalf of the witness and who authorized those expenditures.

The record shall be made available to the witness protection review board for its examination, in furtherance of the monitoring process set forth in §

12-30-9

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-7.
Preparation of witness.

The law enforcement agency which developed the criminal witness protection program together with the attorney general’s office shall be primarily responsible for debriefing the witness and preparing his or her testimony. Those officers involved in the investigation and prosecution of the cases in which the witness is providing evidence shall not be assigned to guard the witness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-8.
Funding.

The cost of maintaining a protected criminal witness in custody shall be paid by the attorney general from funds appropriated to his or her office for that purpose. Expenditures shall be monitored by the witness protection review board, which shall determine an appropriate budget for the maintenance of each witness. In determining that budget, the board shall consider the standard of living provided for inmates at the adult correctional institutions.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-9.
Monitoring.

The witness protection review board shall examine the status of each case involving a protected criminal witness at three (3) month intervals. Any change in the terms of confinement of the witness must be reported to the board within five (5) days of its occurrence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-10.
Rules and regulations.

The attorney general and the state police shall promulgate rules and regulations in furtherance of the administration of their responsibilities pursuant to this chapter. Those rules and regulations shall be submitted to the witness protection review board. Any amendment of or addition to those rules shall be submitted to the board within thirty (30) days of their promulgation.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 327, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 21.

12-30-11.
Priority for trial.

In order to minimize the period of time during which protection must be provided for the witness, the trial of cases in which a protected witness will be testifying shall, upon application of the attorney general, be given priority on the criminal trial calendar by the superior court.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-12.
Annual report.

On the second Friday of January of each year, the attorney general shall submit a report to the general assembly stating the number of proposed agreements submitted to the witness protection review board during the previous year and the number of agreements approved by the board and the attorney general.

In addition, the report shall provide:

The number of witnesses currently in the program;

The number of witnesses in the custody of the department of corrections and in the custody of the state police;

The charges pending against each witness and the proposed disposition resulting from his or her cooperation;

The number of indictments that have resulted from information obtained from each witness;

The number of convictions that have resulted from the information obtained from each witness and the sentences imposed by the court; and

An itemization of all expenditures of public funds made by or on behalf of each witness, listed by the purpose of the expenditure.

The report shall not disclose the identity of any witness not already publicly known to be participating in the program, nor shall it disclose any specific information that might tend to reveal the location of the witness.

History of Section.

P.L. 1990, ch. 326, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 327, § 3; P.L. 1990, ch. 331, § 1.

12-30-13.
Confidentiality of information.

All personally descriptive information, including, but not limited to, names, addresses, telephone numbers, dates of birth, social security numbers, license or identification card numbers, automobile registration numbers, or any other data that may compromise the identity or security of a witness protection program participant, applicant, or former participant or applicant, is not subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 2 of title 38.

Except as provided for in this chapter and any superior court rule of criminal procedure, all information regarding the whereabouts of or expenditures concerning a witness who is participating in witness protection, or whose participation has ended, been terminated, or revoked by the witness protection review board, shall not be released where that release of information would tend to compromise security or endanger witnesses participating in the witness protection program.

All information concerning any meetings of the witness protection review board shall not be subject to disclosure pursuant to chapter 46 of title 42.

The witness protection review board shall be exempt from the provisions of chapter 2 of title 37 in connection with its procurement of any goods, equipment, or services necessary to the implementation of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2001, ch. 65, § 2; P.L. 2001, ch. 244, § 2.